Florida, session 2026, SB1700.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (8) of section 768.21, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (3) and (4) of that 14 section are republished, to read: 15 768.21âDamages.âAll potential beneficiaries of a recovery 16 for wrongful death, including the decedentâs estate, shall be 17 identified in the complaint, and their relationships to the 18 decedent shall be alleged. Damages may be awarded as follows: 19 (3)âMinor children of the decedent, and all children of the 20 decedent if there is no surviving spouse, may also recover for 21 lost parental companionship, instruction, and guidance and for 22 mental pain and suffering from the date of injury. For the 23 purposes of this subsection, if both spouses die within 30 days 24 of one another as a result of the same wrongful act or series of 25 acts arising out of the same incident, each spouse is considered 26 to have been predeceased by the other. 27 (4)âEach parent of a deceased minor child may also recover 28 for mental pain and suffering from the date of injury. Each 29 parent of an adult child may also recover for mental pain and 30 suffering if there are no other survivors. 31 (8)âThe damages specified in subsection (3) shall not be 32 recoverable by adult children and the damages specified in 33 subsection (4) shall not be recoverable by parents of an adult 34 child with respect to claims for medical negligence as defined 35 by s. 766.106(1). 36 Section 2.âSubsection (9) of section 400.023, Florida 37 Statutes, is amended to read: 38 400.023âCivil enforcement.â 39 (9)âAn action under this part for a violation of rights or 40 negligence recognized herein is not a claim for medical 41 malpractice, and s. 768.21(8) does not apply to a claim alleging 42 death of the resident. 43 Section 3.âSection 400.0235, Florida Statutes, is amended 44 to read: 45 400.0235âCertain provisions not applicable to actions under 46 this part.âAn action under this part for a violation of rights 47 or negligence recognized under this part is not a claim for 48 medical malpractice, and the provisions of s. 768.21(8) do not 49 apply to a claim alleging death of the resident. 50 Section 4.âSection 429.295, Florida Statutes, is amended to 51 read: 52 429.295âCertain provisions not applicable to actions under 53 this part.âAn action under this part for a violation of rights 54 or negligence recognized herein is not a claim for medical 55 malpractice, and the provisions of s. 768.21(8) do not apply to 56 a claim alleging death of the resident. 57 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.